Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-117.02
Child with special needs; adoptive parents; reimbursement for adoption expenses.

The Department of Health and Human Services may make a payment of up to two thousand dollars on behalf of a child with special needs after the legal completion of the child's adoption, including a tribal customary adoption as defined in section 43-1503. The payment to the adoptive parents shall be a reimbursement for nonrecurring adoption expenses, including reasonable and necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney's fees, and other expenses which are directly related to the legal adoption of the child, which are not incurred in violation of law, and which have not been reimbursed from any other source or funds.

Laws 1990, LB 1070, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 116;

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 9.
July 18, 2026